Florida, session 2026, HB1173.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
13
14 Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 327.46, Florida
15 Statutes, is amended to read:
16 327.46 Boating-restricted areas.—
17 (1) Boating-restricted areas, including, but not limited
18 to, restrictions on vessel speed and operation, may be
19 established as follows: of vessel speeds and vessel traffic, may
20 be established on the waters of this state for any purpose
21 necessary to protect the safety of the public if such
22 restrictions are necessary based on boating accidents,
23 visibility, hazardous currents or water levels, vessel traffic
24 congestion, or other navigational hazards or to protect
25 seagrasses on privately owned submerged lands.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1173-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1173 2026
26 (a) The commission may establish boating-restricted areas
27 by rule pursuant to chapter 120.
28 (b) Municipalities and counties may establish the
29 following boating-restricted areas by ordinance, including,
30 notwithstanding the prohibition in s. 327.60(2)(c), within the
31 portion of the Florida Intracoastal Waterway within their
32 jurisdiction:
33 1. An ordinance establishing an idle speed, no wake
34 boating-restricted area, if the area is:
35 a. Within 500 feet of any boat ramp, hoist, marine
36 railway, or other launching or landing facility available for
37 use by the general boating public on waterways more than 300
38 feet in width or within 300 feet of any boat ramp, hoist, marine
39 railway, or other launching or landing facility available for
40 use by the general boating public on waterways not exceeding 300
41 feet in width.
42 b. Within 500 feet of fuel pumps or dispensers at any
43 marine fueling facility that sells motor fuel to the general
44 boating public on waterways more than 300 feet in width or
45 within 300 feet of the fuel pumps or dispensers at any licensed
46 terminal facility that sells motor fuel to the general boating
47 public on waterways not exceeding 300 feet in width.
48 c. Inside or within 300 feet of any lock structure.
49 2. An ordinance establishing a slow speed, minimum wake
50 boating-restricted area if the area is:
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1173-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1173 2026
51 a. Within 300 feet of any bridge fender system.
52 b. Within 300 feet of any bridge span presenting a
53 vertical clearance of less than 25 feet or a horizontal
54 clearance of less than 100 feet.
55 c. On a creek, stream, canal, or similar linear waterway
56 if the waterway is less than 75 feet in width from shoreline to
57 shoreline.
58 d. On a lake or pond of less than 10 acres in total
59 surface area.
60 e. Within the boundaries of a permitted public mooring
61 field and a buffer around the mooring field of up to 100 feet.
62 f. Within 500 feet of a sewage pumpout station at any
63 public or private nonresidential marina if the sewage pumpout
64 station is within 100 feet of the marked channel of the Florida
65 Intracoastal Waterway.
66 3. An ordinance establishing a vessel-exclusion zone if
67 the area is:
68 a. Designated as a public bathing beach or swim area,
69 except that such areas may not be created on waters that include
70 any portion of the Florida Intracoastal Waterway or that are
71 within 100 feet of the marked channel of the Florida
72 Intracoastal Waterway.
73 b. Within 300 feet of a dam, spillway, or flood control
74 structure.
75
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1173-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1173 2026
76 Vessel exclusion zones created pursuant to this subparagraph
77 must be marked with uniform waterway markers permitted by the
78 commission in accordance with this chapter. Such zones may not
79 be marked by ropes.
80 (c) Municipalities and counties may have the authority to
81 establish by ordinance the following other boating-restricted
82 areas to regulate vessel speed and operation:
83 1. An ordinance establishing an idle speed, no wake
84 boating-restricted area, if the area is within 300 feet of a
85 confluence of water bodies presenting a blind corner up to a
86 distance of 1,000 feet if the extended area is necessary to
87 ensure safe navigation and visibility for approaching vessels.
88 The boundaries of such areas must be clearly marked with uniform
89 waterway markers consistent with commission rules, a bend in a
90 narrow channel or fairway, or such other area if an intervening
91 obstruction to visibility may obscure other vessels or other
92 users of the waterway.
93 2. An ordinance establishing a slow speed, minimum wake,
94 or numerical speed limit boating-restricted area if the area is:
95 a. Within 300 feet of a confluence of water bodies
96 presenting a blind corner, a bend in a narrow channel or
97 fairway, or such other area if an intervening obstruction to
98 visibility may obscure other vessels or other users of the
99 waterway.
100 b. Subject to unsafe levels of vessel traffic congestion.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1173-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1173 2026
101 c. Subject to hazardous water levels or currents, or
102 containing other navigational hazards.
103 d. An area that accident reports, uniform boating
104 citations, vessel traffic studies, or other creditable data
105 demonstrate to present a significant risk of collision or a
106 significant threat to boating safety.
107 3. An ordinance establishing a vessel-exclusion zone if
108 the area is reserved exclusively:
109 a. As a canoe trail or otherwise limited to vessels under
110 oars or under sail.
111 b. For a particular activity and user group separation
112 must be imposed to protect the safety of those participating in
113 such activity.
114
115 Any of the ordinances adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall
116 not take effect until the commission has reviewed the ordinance
117 and determined by substantial competent evidence that the
118 ordinance is necessary to protect public safety pursuant to this
119 paragraph. Any application for approval of an ordinance shall be
120 reviewed and acted upon within 90 days after receipt of a
121 completed application. Within 30 days after a municipality or
122 county submits an application for approval to the commission,
123 the commission shall advise the municipality or county as to
124 what information, if any, is needed to deem the application
125 complete. An application shall be considered complete upon
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1173-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1173 2026
126 receipt of all requested information and correction of any error
127 or omission for which the applicant was timely notified or when
128 the time for such notification has expired. The commission's
129 action on the application shall be subject to review under
130 chapter 120. The commission shall initiate rulemaking no later
131 than January 1, 2010, to provide criteria and procedures for
132 reviewing applications and procedures for providing for public
133 notice and participation pursuant to this paragraph.
134 (d) Owners of private submerged lands that are adjacent to
135 Outstanding Florida Waters, as defined in s. 403.061(28), or an
136 aquatic preserve established under ss. 258.39-258.399 may
137 request that the commission establish boating-restricted areas
138 solely to protect any seagrass and contiguous seagrass habitat
139 within their private property boundaries from seagrass scarring
140 due to propeller dredging. Owners making a request pursuant to
141 this paragraph must demonstrate to the commission clear
142 ownership of the submerged lands. The commission shall adopt
143 rules to implement this paragraph, including, but not limited
144 to, establishing an application process and criteria for meeting
145 the requirements of this paragraph. Each approved boating-
146 restricted area shall be established by commission rule. For
147 marking boating-restricted zones established pursuant to this
148 paragraph, owners of privately submerged lands shall apply to
149 the commission for a uniform waterway marker permit in
150 accordance with ss. 327.40 and 327.41, and shall be responsible
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1173-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1173 2026
151 for marking the boating-restricted zone in accordance with the
152 terms of the permit.
153 (e) As used in this section, the term "seagrass" has the
154 same meaning as in s. 253.04.
155 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1173-00